Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB423.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Future Voters Act.Section 2. Legislative finding and declaration.The General Assembly finds as follows:(1) The Commonwealth is committed to promoting and fostering civic participation and granting equal access to voter registration for all voters.(2) The Commonwealth recognizes the importance of promoting and fostering lifelong civic participation.(3) Many emerging adults are denied access to the most 1234567891011121314151617 popular form of voter registration, motor voter.(4) If an individual obtains a driver's license at 16 or 17 years of age, the individual may not understand the importance of the right to vote and may fail to register to vote when the individual reaches 18 years of age.(5) A statistical analysis of all registered voters in this Commonwealth revealed that in 2024, only 9% of registrants were 18 to 24 years of age. Denial of motor voter to so many emerging adults may contribute to lower voter registration levels in the youngest voter age groups.(6) However, some studies show that emerging and young adults who vote are likely to continue to do so.(7) The representational disparities in voter registration rates and voting within the emerging and young adult electorate will improve by enacting election policies that engage all emerging and young adults in this Commonwealth.(8) This act is intended to increase voter turnout in emerging and young adults.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"County commission." A registration commission established under 25 Pa.C.S. § 1203 (relating to commissions)."Eligible student." An individual enrolled in a school entity in this Commonwealth who is 16 or 17 years of age."Future voter." An eligible student who:(1) except for age, meets all the qualifications for voting prescribed by the Constitution of Pennsylvania and the 20250HB0423PN0415 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 laws of this Commonwealth; and(2) provides information related to voter registration to the Department of State or the appropriate county commission to facilitate preregistration to vote."Program." The Future Voter Program established under this act."School entity." As defined in section 111.1 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949."Secretary." The Secretary of Education of the Commonwealth."Sign up." A procedure that allows an eligible student to register to vote prior to the time that the eligible student will be 18 years of age by the next election."SURE system." The Statewide Uniform Registry of Electors as defined in 25 Pa.C.S. § 1102 (relating to definitions).Section 4. Future Voter Program.(a) Establishment.--The secretary, in consultation with the Secretary of the Commonwealth, shall establish the Future Voter Program for use by school entities to provide age-appropriate instructions to students in grades 1 through 12 on topics related to civics and civic participation, including educational programming on the history of the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of Pennsylvania.(b) Program components.--(1) On September 17 of each school year, or on the preceding Friday when September 17 falls on a nonschool day, "Constitution and Citizenship Day" shall be observed by each school entity as part of the school entity's program. As part of this observance, a school entity may designate particular laws or may develop school-entity specific programming 20250HB0423PN0415 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 related to civics and civic participation for special observance.(2) During the observance of "Constitution and Citizenship Day" in accordance with paragraph (1), each school entity shall, as resources permit, coordinate a voter registration event in each history or social studies class scheduled for eligible students. The voter registration event shall:(i) Be a component of each school entity's program.(ii) Make voter sign-up or voter registration available to all eligible students.(iii) Provide all students who will be 18 years of age or older by the time of the next general election the opportunity to register to vote online in the classroom.(iv) Make voter registration applications available in the classroom. Eligible students who do not possess a driver's license or State identification card shall be provided a voter registration application. This subparagraph shall not be construed to prevent or prohibit eligible students who hold a driver's license or State identification card from requesting and receiving a voter registration application.(v) Include adequate time for eligible students to complete the voter registration process in class.(vi) Allow students who are 16 or 17 years of age to sign up to register to vote, including by mail. Except as provided in subsection (d), the name of a student who signs up to register to vote under this subparagraph may not be added to the SURE system until the student reaches 18 years of age.20250HB0423PN0415 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Duties of secretary.--The secretary, in consultation with the Secretary of the Commonwealth or the county commissions, shall:(1) Distribute voter registration materials to school entities for use by eligible students to register to vote at school on "Constitution and Citizenship Day" or on any other school day that may be designated by a school entity.(2) Notify each school entity of the availability of voter registration materials by electronic mail or in any other appropriate manner.(3) Consult with the Secretary of the Commonwealth to provide registration methods that enable the electronic collection of information on the number of eligible students who registered to vote on "Constitution and Citizenship Day."(d) Duties of Secretary of the Commonwealth.--The Secretary of the Commonwealth, in consultation with county commissions, shall:(1) Provide for the registration of students who have attained 16 years of age and who hold a valid Pennsylvania driver's license or identification card as part of the program by submitting a voter registration application electronically on the Department of State's publicly accessible Internet website. The Secretary of the Commonwealth may accept the last four digits of a student's Social Security number if the student does not hold a valid driver's license or identification card. Each student must attest to the truth of the information provided on the application by affirmatively accepting the information as true.(2) For each electronic registration application 20250HB0423PN0415 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 received under paragraph (1), obtain a digital copy of the applicant's driver's license or State identification card signature from the Department of Transportation.(3) Provide for the maintenance and storage of pending registration records for all future voters who are not 18 years of age in a database engineered to ensure that no pending registration record will be recorded in or otherwise transferred to the SURE system until the future voter is 18 years of age and is no longer in pending status.(4) Assign a unique identifier to future voters who are under 18 years of age.(5) Permit each county commission to have access to the future voter database and to allow a county commission to send notices to future voters related to registration status or any other information related to voter registration.(e) Disclosure not authorized.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law, information that is otherwise disclosable under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, shall not be deemed public information and, except for the purpose of processing and delivering ballots, shall not be disclosed on any eligible student until the eligible student reaches 18 years of age.(f) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a school entity from designating any other school day or time to facilitate the intent and purpose of this act.Section 5. Voter registration applications.(a) Completeness.--(1) A voter registration application received by the Department of State or a county commission through the 20250HB0423PN0415 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 program shall be considered complete only if the application contains the information required under 25 Pa.C.S. § 1327 (relating to preparation and distribution of applications), provided that an eligible student who registers to vote through the program shall not be considered to be registered unless the eligible student will be 18 years of age by the date of the next election. An eligible student shall:(i) Attest to the truth of the information provided on the application by affirmatively accepting the information as true.(ii) If signing up to register by mail, provide a signature for voter registration purposes.(iii) Affirmatively acknowledge that the student will not vote until the student reaches 18 years of age.(2) A voter registration application received by the Department of State or a county commission through the program shall be classified as pending if the eligible student will be 18 years of age by the date of the next election. The Department of State or county commission shall remove the pending status when the future voter attains 18 years of age.(b) Incomplete application.--If an application is not complete, the county commission shall promptly notify the eligible student in accordance with 25 Pa.C.S. § 1328 (relating to approval of registration applications).(c) Disclosure not authorized.--(1) The personal identifiable information of eligible students under 18 years of age who sign up or register to vote through the program shall be exempt from public inspection, copying and disclosure under the act of February 20250HB0423PN0415 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, except for the purpose of processing and delivering ballots.(2) A county commission shall not include the personal identifiable information contained in an eligible student's voter registration application on the master list of prospective jurors prepared by the county under 42 Pa.C.S. § 4521 (relating to selection of prospective jurors) and no eligible student shall be qualified to serve as a juror under 42 Pa.C.S. § 4521 until the eligible student reaches 18 years of age.Section 6. Guidelines.The secretary, in consultation with the Secretary of the Commonwealth, shall promulgate and adopt guidelines to administer the provisions of this act.Section 7. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0423PN0415 - 8 - 12345678910111213141516